District of Columbia statutes.
22-3204

Case referral.

For the purposes of this chapter, in cases involving more than one jurisdiction, or in cases where more than one District of Columbia agency is responsible for investigating an alleged violation, the investigating agency to which the report was initially made may refer the matter to another investigating or law enforcement agency with proper jurisdiction.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 104
as added Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 214(c), 56 DCR 7413

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102(c) of Crime Bill Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-129, June 29, 2009, 56 DCR 5495).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 214(c) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 214(c) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).

Emergency Legislation